District of Columbia statutes.
6-711.03

Inspection of buildings for violative conditions; interference with inspection.

Recodified as § 42-3131.03.

History

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 115, ch. 1626, § 3
June 11, 1960, 74 Stat. 203, Pub. L. 86-507, § 1(43)